local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="tres/ti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ti</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>i</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>em</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>eš</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>emo</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ete</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>u</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijah</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaše</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijasmo</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijaste</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ijahu</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>oh</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>e</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>osmo</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>oste</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>oše</l>
         <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ne__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- ORTHOGRAPHIC PARADIGMS -->

    <!-- Vowel change ~ Ekavian - Ijekavian -->

    <pardef n="e_je__yat">
      <group alt="sh">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_BS">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_HR">
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
      <group alt="sh_SR">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>e</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e r="LR">
          <p>
            <l>je</l>
            <r>e</r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </group>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_ije__yat">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ije</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_i__yat">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gde"><i>gde</i><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kako"><i>kako</i><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tresti"><i>tres</i><par n="tres/ti__vblex"/></e>
